Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3523.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 400 of Title 75A, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
As used in this act:
1. "Social media platform" means any online platform that:
a. is primarily engaged in hosting user-generated
content,
b. has more than one hundred million monthly active users
worldwide, and
Req. No. 15607 Page 1

c. is accessible to users located in Oklahoma;
2. "User" means a person or entity lawfully using a social
media platform;
3. "Page" or "account" means a user profile, channel, page, or
similar presence used to publish or distribute content;
4. "Adverse action" means the suspension, deletion,
demonetization, shadow-banning, restriction, or permanent removal of
a page or account; and
5. "Emergency action" means a temporary restriction necessary
to prevent imminent harm.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 401 of Title 75A, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. A social media platform shall not take adverse action
against a user's page or account unless it first provides:
1. Electronic written notice specifying:
a. the precise rule allegedly violated,
b. the specific content at issue,
c. the evidence relied upon, and
d. the proposed action;
2. A meaningful opportunity to be heard, including:
a. not less than seven (7) business days to respond,
b. ability to submit evidence and written argument, and
c. review by a trained human decision-maker; and
Req. No. 15607 Page 2

3. An electronic written final decision stating:
a. findings of fact,
b. conclusions, and
c. the rule applied.
B. A platform may impose a temporary restriction without prior
hearing only when necessary to prevent imminent harm, provided:
1. Electronic written notice is provided within twenty-four
(24) hours;
2. A full and fair hearing is completed within seven (7) days;
and
3. If the platform fails to justify the action, the account
shall be fully restored.
C. Users shall have a right to one internal appeal of adverse
action taken against the user's page or account.
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 402 of Title 75A, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Any user aggrieved by a violation of this act may bring a
civil action to recover:
1. Actual damages;
2. Statutory damages of Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) per
violation;
3. Injunctive relief; and
4. Reasonable attorney fees and costs.
Req. No. 15607 Page 3

B. The Attorney General may bring an action to:
1. Enjoin violations;
2. Recover civil penalties up to Twenty-five Thousand Dollars
($25,000.00) per violation; and
3. Require compliance audits.
SECTION 4. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-15607 MJ 01/09/25
















Req. No. 15607 Page 4